Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 6 Probation Management

Editor’s notes.

This article is the same as or substantially similar to former Article 9 of Chapter 8 of Title 42.

42-3-110.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Probation Management Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-110

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310.

42-3-111.
Definitions.

For purposes of this article, the term:

“Chief community supervision officer” means the highest ranking field community supervision officer in each judicial circuit.

“Electronic monitoring” means supervising, mapping, or tracking the location of a probationer by means including electronic surveillance, voice recognition, facial recognition, fingerprinting or biometric scan, automated kiosk, automobile ignition interlock device, or global positioning systems which may coordinate data with crime scene information.

“Hearing officer” means an impartial DCS employee or representative who has been selected and appointed to hear alleged cases regarding violations of probation for administrative sanctioning.

“Initial sanction” means the sanction set by the judge upon initial sentencing.

“Options system day reporting center” means a state facility providing supervision of probationers which includes, but is not limited to, mandatory reporting, program participation, drug testing, community service, all special conditions of probation, and general conditions of probation as set forth in Code Section 42-8-35.

“Options system probationer” means a probationer who has been sentenced to the sentencing options system.

“Probation supervision” means a level of probation supervision which includes, but is not limited to, general conditions of probation as set forth in Code Section 42-8-35 and all special conditions of probation.

“Residential substance abuse treatment facility” means a state correctional facility that provides inpatient treatment for alcohol and drug abuse.

“Sentencing options system” means a continuum of sanctions for probationers that includes the sanctions set forth in subsection (c) of Code Section 42-3-113.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-111

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310.

Law reviews.

For article, “Hiding in Plain Sight:
A Fourth Amendment Framework for Analyzing Government Surveillance in Public,” see 66 Emory L.J. 527 (2017).

42-3-112.
Sentencing options system.

In addition to any other terms or conditions of probation provided for under this chapter, the sentencing judge may require that defendants who are sentenced to probation pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 42-8-34 be ordered to the sentencing options system.

When a defendant has been ordered to the sentencing options system, the court shall retain jurisdiction throughout the period of the probated sentence as provided in subsection (g) of Code Section 42-8-34 and may modify or revoke any part of a probated sentence as provided in Code Section 42-8-34.1 and subsection (c) of Code Section 42-8-38.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-112

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310.

42-3-113.
System of administrative sanctions.

DCS shall be authorized to establish by rules and regulations a system of administrative sanctions as an alternative to judicial modifications or revocations for probationers who violate the terms and conditions of the sentencing options system established under this article. DCS may not, however, sanction probationers for violations of special conditions of probation or general conditions of probation for which the sentencing judge has expressed an intention that such violations be heard by the court pursuant to Code Section 42-8-34.1.

DCS shall only impose restrictions which are equal to or less restrictive than the sanction cap set by the sentencing judge.

The administrative sanctions which may be imposed by DCS are as follows, from most restrictive to least restrictive:

Probation detention center or residential substance abuse treatment facility;

Probation boot camp;

DCS day reporting center;

Electronic monitoring;

Community service; or

Probation supervision.

DCS may order offenders sanctioned pursuant to paragraphs (1) through (3) of subsection (c) of this Code section to be held in the local jail until transported to a designated facility.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-113

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310.

42-3-114.
Preliminary hearing for alleged violation of probation.

Whenever an options system probationer is arrested on a warrant for an alleged violation of probation, an informal preliminary hearing shall be held within a reasonable time not to exceed 15 days.

A preliminary hearing shall not be required when:

The probationer is not under arrest on a warrant;

The probationer signed a waiver of a preliminary hearing; or

The administrative hearing referred to in Code Section 42-3-115 will be held within 15 days of arrest.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-114

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310.

42-3-115.
Authorization to impose administrative sanctions; petition; hearing; administrative proceeding.

If an options system probationer violates the conditions of probation, DCS may impose administrative sanctions as an alternative to judicial modification or revocation of probation.

Upon issuance of a petition outlining the alleged probation violations, the chief community supervision officer, or his or her designee, may conduct a hearing to determine whether an options system probationer has violated a condition of probation. If the chief community supervision officer determines that the probationer has violated a condition of probation, the chief community supervision officer shall be authorized to impose sanctions consistent with paragraphs (4) through (6) of subsection (c) of Code Section 42-3-113. The failure of an options system probationer to comply with a sanction imposed by the chief community supervision officer shall constitute a violation of probation.

Upon issuance of a petition outlining the alleged probation violations, the hearing officer may initiate an administrative proceeding to determine whether an options system probationer has violated a condition of probation. If the hearing officer determines by a preponderance of the evidence that the probationer has violated a condition of probation, the hearing officer may impose sanctions consistent with Code Section 42-3-113.

The administrative proceeding provided for under this subsection shall be commenced within 15 days but not less than 48 hours after notice of the administrative proceeding has been served on the probationer. The administrative proceeding may be conducted electronically.

The failure of a probationer to comply with the sanction or sanctions imposed by the chief community supervision officer or hearing officer shall constitute a violation of probation.

An options system probationer may at any time waive a hearing and voluntarily accept the sanctions proposed by DCS.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-115

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 42/HB 737.

The 2016 amendment,

effective May 3, 2016, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “paragraphs (4) through (6)” for “paragraphs (4) through (7)” in the second sentence of subsection (b).

42-3-116.
Finality of hearing officer’s decision; request for review; appeal.

The hearing officer’s decision shall be final unless the options system probationer files a request for review with the senior hearing officer. A request for review must be filed within 15 days of the issuance of DCS’s decision. Such request shall not stay DCS’s decision. The senior hearing officer shall issue a response within seven days of receipt of the review request.

The senior hearing officer’s decision shall be final unless the options system probationer files an appeal in the sentencing court. Such appeal shall name the commissioner as defendant and shall be filed within 30 days of the issuance of the decision by the senior hearing officer.

This appeal shall first be reviewed by the judge upon the record. At the judge’s discretion, a de novo hearing may be held on the decision. The filing of the appeal shall not stay DCS’s decision.

Where the sentencing judge does not act on the appeal within 30 days of the date of the filing of the appeal, DCS’s decision shall be affirmed by operation of law.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-116

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310.

42-3-117.
Article not construed as repealing any court’s probationary or supervisory power.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed as repealing any power given to any court of this state to place offenders on probation or to provide conditions of supervision for offenders.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-117

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310.

42-3-118.
Applicability of article.

This article shall only apply in judicial circuits where DCS has allocated certified hearing officers.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-118

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310.

42-3-119.
Liberal construction of article.

This article shall be liberally construed so that its purposes may be achieved.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-119

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310.